Massachusetts, session 194th, S266.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 93K of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the words “subsection (d)”, in line 42, the
following words:- “or (f)”.
SECTION 2. Subsection (f) of section 2 of said chapter 93K, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:-
“Commencing in model year 2022 and thereafter a manufacturer of motor vehicles sold
in the Commonwealth, including heavy duty vehicles that are not heavy duty vehicles built to
custom specifications sold in the commonwealth for commercial purposes, that utilize a
of 2

telematics system shall be required to equip such vehicles with an inter-operable, standardized
and open access platform across all of the manufacturer’s makes and models.”
of 2